New York, session 2025-2026, A7645.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The not-for-profit corporation law is amended by adding a 2 new section 206 to read as follows: 3 § 206. Expansion of purpose; certain firefighter's benevolent associ- 4 ations. 5 An incorporated firefighter's benevolent association created by act of 6 the legislature may include the following in the purposes of such asso- 7 ciation without an additional act of the legislature: 8 (a) to promote friendly association for the betterment of the members 9 of the corporation; 10 (b) to promote relations between the members of the corporation and 11 the local community; 12 (c) to provide relief, aid and assistance to those members and their 13 families who are injured, disabled or indigent; 14 (d) to provide for the health and safety of the members of the corpo- 15 ration; 16 (e) to maintain suitable headquarters for the members of the corpo- 17 ration; 18 (f) to acquire real and personal property such as may be necessary for 19 the purposes set forth in this section; 20 (g) to study and disseminate among the members of the corporation the 21 most efficient manner of fighting fires; and 22 (h) to promote the volunteer fire service within the territory now 23 served or which may hereafter be served by the fire department associ- 24 ated with such corporation. 25 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10092-01-5